Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 902.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 902.8 Minimum sentence ââ habitual offender. An A habitual offender is any person convicted of a class âCâ or a class âDâ felony, who has twice before been convicted of any felony in a court of this or any other state, or of the United States. An offense is a felony if, by the law under which the person is convicted, it is so classified at the time of the personâs conviction. A person convicted of a third qualifying felony shall be sentenced as a habitual offender and shall serve a minimum of seven years of the sentence imposed by law. A person sentenced as an a habitual offender shall not be eligible for parole until the person has served the minimum sentence of confinement of three seven years. Earned time accrued pursuant to chapter 903A shall not reduce the minimum sentence of confinement of seven years. Sec. 2. Section 902.9, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: c. An A habitual offender shall be confined for no more than fifteen twenty years. Sec. 3. Section 907.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: House File 2542, p. 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Probation officers shall report probation violations to the proper authorities. Sec. 4. Section 907.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) An offense qualifying the defendant as a habitual offender under section 902.8. Sec. 5. Section 907.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . i. A sentence imposed pursuant to section 902.8. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2542, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor